California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

6010.30.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase,” for the purpose of this part, do not include the transfer of original drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings by an artist or designer at a social gathering for entertainment purposes, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Substantially all of the drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings are delivered by the artist or designer to a person or persons other than the purchaser.

(2) Substantially all of the drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings are received by a person or persons, other than the purchaser, at no cost to the person or persons who become the owner of the drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings.

(3) The charge for the drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings is based on a preset fee.

(4) The fee charged for the drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings is contingent upon a minimum number of at least three drawings, sketches, illustrations, or paintings to be produced by the artist or designer at the social gathering.

(b) For purposes of this section, “substantially all” means 80 percent or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Operative April 1, 2000, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.40.

“Sale” and “purchase,” for the purpose of this part, do not include the transfer by a city, city and county, county, or other local government animal shelter or a nonprofit animal welfare organization of any animal to an individual for use as a pet, or any charges made by the government shelter or nonprofit organization for services in connection with the transfer of that animal, including, but not limited to, the spaying or neutering or future spaying or neutering of the animal, or any vaccination, future vaccination, or similar
 service. For purposes of this section, “nonprofit animal welfare organization” means any organization formed and operated for the primary purpose of prevention of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of animals and that qualifies for the exemption from taxation pursuant to Section 23701d.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   Effective September 7, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.50.

(a) For purposes of this part, “sale” and “purchase” do not include any transfer of an endangered or threatened animal or plant species acquired or disposed of through a trade or exchange between nonprofit zoological societies or between a member of the American Zoo and Aquarium Association (AZA) and a nonprofit zoological society.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 6366.5, “endangered or threatened animal or plant species” means animals or plants that are any of
 the following:

(1) Listed in Appendix I, II, or III to the Convention for International Trade of Endangered Species.

(2) Listed as endangered or threatened by the United States Department of the Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service.

(c) For purposes of this section and Section 6366.5, a “nonprofit zoological society” includes both of the following:

(1) A zoological society operated for charitable, educational, or scientific purposes and qualified for exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) A zoological park owned or operated by a city, county, or other instrumentality of any state or foreign government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

(a) “Sales price” means the total amount for which tangible personal property is sold or leased or rented, as the case may be, valued in money, whether paid in money or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any of the following:

(1) The cost of the property sold.

(2) The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest charged, losses, or any other expenses.

(3) The cost of transportation of the property, except as excluded by other provisions of this section.

(b) The total amount for which the property is sold or leased or rented includes all of the following:

(1) Any services that are a part of the sale.

(2) Any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by the seller.

(3) The amount of any tax imposed by the United States upon producers and importers of gasoline and the amount of any tax imposed pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of this division.

(c) “Sales price” does not include any of the following:

(1) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.

(2) The amount charged for property returned by customers when that entire amount is refunded either in cash or credit, but this exclusion shall not apply in any instance when the customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to purchase other property at a price greater than the amount charged for the property that is returned. For the purpose of this section, refund or credit of the entire amount shall be deemed to be given when the purchase price less rehandling and restocking costs are refunded or credited to the customer. The amount withheld for rehandling and restocking costs may be a percentage of the sales price determined by the average cost of rehandling and restocking returned merchandise during the previous accounting cycle.

(3) The amount charged for labor or services rendered in installing or applying
 the property sold.

(4) (A) The amount of any tax (not including, however, any manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax, except as provided in subparagraph (B)) imposed by the United States upon or with respect to retail sales whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(B) The amount of manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code for which the purchaser certifies that he or she is entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise tax paid or for which the purchaser issues a certificate pursuant to Section 6245.5.

(5) The amount of any tax imposed by any city, county, city and county, or rapid transit district within the State of California upon or with respect to retail sales
 of tangible personal property, measured by a stated percentage of sales price or gross receipts, whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(6) The amount of any tax imposed by any city, county, city and county, or rapid transit district within the State of California with respect to the storage, use or other consumption in that city, county, city and county, or rapid transit district of tangible personal property measured by a stated percentage of sales price or purchase price, whether the tax is imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(7) Separately stated charges for transportation from the retailer’s place of business or other point from which shipment is made directly to the purchaser, but the exclusion shall not exceed a reasonable charge for transportation by facilities of the retailer or the cost to the retailer of transportation by other than facilities of the
 retailer. However, if the transportation is by facilities of the retailer, or the property is sold for a delivered price, this exclusion shall be applicable solely with respect to transportation which occurs after the purchase of the property is made.

(8) Charges for transporting landfill from an excavation site to a site specified by the purchaser, either if the charge is separately stated and does not exceed a reasonable charge or if the entire consideration consists of payment for transportation.

(9) The amount of any motor vehicle, mobilehome, or commercial coach fee or tax imposed by and paid the State of California that has been added to or is measured by a stated percentage of the sales or purchase price of a motor vehicle, mobilehome, or commercial coach.

(10) (A) The amount charged for
 intangible personal property transferred with tangible personal property in any technology transfer agreement, if the technology transfer agreement separately states a reasonable price for the tangible personal property.

(B) If the technology transfer agreement does not separately state a price for the tangible personal property, and the tangible personal property or like tangible personal property has been previously sold or leased, or offered for sale or lease, to third parties at a separate price, the price at which the tangible personal property was sold, leased, or offered to third parties shall be used to establish the retail fair market value of the tangible personal property subject to tax. The remaining amount charged under the technology transfer agreement is for the intangible personal property transferred.

(C) If the technology transfer agreement does not separately
 state a price for the tangible personal property, and the tangible personal property or like tangible personal property has not been previously sold or leased, or offered for sale or lease, to third parties at a separate price, the retail fair market value shall be equal to 200 percent of the cost of materials and labor used to produce the tangible personal property subject to tax. The remaining amount charged under the technology transfer agreement is for the intangible personal property transferred.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “technology transfer agreement” means any agreement under which a person who holds a patent or copyright interest assigns or licenses to another person the right to make and sell a product or to use a process that is subject to the patent or copyright interest.

(11) The amount of any tax imposed upon diesel fuel pursuant to Part 31 (commencing with
 Section 60001).

(12) (A) The amount of tax imposed by any Indian tribe within the State of California with respect to a retail sale of tangible personal property measured by a stated percentage of the sales or purchase price, whether the tax is imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(B) The exclusion authorized by subparagraph (A) shall only apply to those retailers who are in substantial compliance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 2002.   Operative January 1, 2003, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 593.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6011, “sales price” from the sale of tangible personal property by consumer cooperatives, as defined in subdivision (b), shall not include the value of initial or periodic membership fees and the value of labor performed in lieu of, or as part of, monthly membership fees; provided, the exclusion authorized by this section shall not be interpreted to permit consumer cooperatives to exclude from “sales price” the cost of the property sold.

(b) As used in this section, consumer cooperative means a corporation or group
 of persons composed of ultimate producers or consumers, or both, organized for the purpose of conducting any lawful business primarily for the mutual benefit of its shareholders who may be natural or legal persons, and the earnings, savings, or benefits of which are used for the general welfare of the shareholders or patrons or are distributed in the form of cash, stock, evidences of indebtedness, goods, or services, proportionately and equitably among the persons for which it does business upon the basis of the amount of their transactions or participation in production, or both. However, any such corporation may pay out of its net surplus earnings, savings, or benefits, not to exceed 5 percent interest upon its capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.

(a) “Gross receipts” mean the total amount of the sale or lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of retailers, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any of the following:

(1) The cost of the property sold. However, in accordance with any rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, a deduction may be taken if the retailer has purchased property for some other purpose
 than resale, has reimbursed his or her vendor for tax which the vendor is required to pay to the state or has paid the use tax with respect to the property, and has resold the property prior to making any use of the property other than retention, demonstration, or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business. If that deduction is taken by the retailer, no refund or credit will be allowed to his or her vendor with respect to the sale of the property.

(2) The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost, interest paid, losses, or any other expense.

(3) The cost of transportation of the property, except as excluded by other provisions of this section.

(4) The amount of any tax imposed by the United States upon producers and importers of gasoline and the amount of any tax imposed pursuant to
 Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of this division.

(b) The total amount of the sale or lease or rental price includes all of the following:

(1) Any services that are a part of the sale.

(2) All receipts, cash, credits and property of any kind.

(3) Any amount for which credit is allowed by the seller to the purchaser.

(c) “Gross receipts” do not include any of the following:

(1) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.

(2) Sale price of property returned by customers when that entire amount is refunded either in cash or credit, but this exclusion shall not
 apply in any instance when the customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to purchase other property at a price greater than the amount charged for the property that is returned. For the purpose of this section, refund or credit of the entire amount shall be deemed to be given when the purchase price less rehandling and restocking costs are refunded or credited to the customer. The amount withheld for rehandling and restocking costs may be a percentage of the sales price determined by the average cost of rehandling and restocking returned merchandise during the previous accounting cycle.

(3) The price received for labor or services used in installing or applying the property sold.

(4) (A) The amount of any tax (not including, however, any manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax, except as provided in subparagraph (B)) imposed by the United States
 upon or with respect to retail sales whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(B) The amount of manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code for which the purchaser certifies that he or she is entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise tax paid or for which the purchaser issues a certificate pursuant to Section 6245.5.

(5) The amount of any tax imposed by any city, county, city and county, or rapid transit district within the State of California upon or with respect to retail sales of tangible personal property measured by a stated percentage of sales price or gross receipts whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(6) The amount of any tax imposed by any city, county, city and
 county, or rapid transit district within the State of California with respect to the storage, use or other consumption in that city, county, city and county, or rapid transit district of tangible personal property measured by a stated percentage of sales price or purchase price, whether the tax is imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(7) Separately stated charges for transportation from the retailer’s place of business or other point from which shipment is made directly to the purchaser, but the exclusion shall not exceed a reasonable charge for transportation by facilities of the retailer or the cost to the retailer of transportation by other than facilities of the retailer. However, if the transportation is by facilities of the retailer, or the property is sold for a delivered price, this exclusion shall be applicable solely with respect to transportation which occurs after the sale of the property is made to the purchaser.

(8) Charges for transporting landfill from an excavation site to a site specified by the purchaser, either if the charge is separately stated and does not exceed a reasonable charge or if the entire consideration consists of payment for transportation.

(9) The amount of any motor vehicle, mobilehome, or commercial coach fee or tax imposed by and paid to the State of California that has been added to or is measured by a stated percentage of the sales or purchase price of a motor vehicle, mobilehome, or commercial coach.

(10) (A) The amount charged for intangible personal property transferred with tangible personal property in any technology transfer agreement, if the technology transfer agreement separately states a reasonable price for the tangible personal property.

(B) If the technology transfer agreement does not separately state a price for the tangible personal property, and the tangible personal property or like tangible personal property has been previously sold or leased, or offered for sale or lease, to third parties at a separate price, the price at which the tangible personal property was sold, leased, or offered to third parties shall be used to establish the retail fair market value of the tangible personal property subject to tax. The remaining amount charged under the technology transfer agreement is for the intangible personal property transferred.

(C) If the technology transfer agreement does not separately state a price for the tangible personal property, and the tangible personal property or like tangible personal property has not been previously sold or leased, or offered for sale or lease, to third parties at a separate
 price, the retail fair market value shall be equal to 200 percent of the cost of materials and labor used to produce the tangible personal property subject to tax. The remaining amount charged under the technology transfer agreement is for the intangible personal property transferred.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “technology transfer agreement” means any agreement under which a person who holds a patent or copyright interest assigns or licenses to another person the right to make and sell a product or to use a process that is subject to the patent or copyright interest.

(11) The amount of any tax imposed upon diesel fuel pursuant to Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001).

(12) (A) The amount of tax imposed by any Indian tribe within the State of California with respect to a retail sale
 of tangible personal property measured by a stated percentage of the sales or purchase price, whether the tax is imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

(B) The exclusion authorized by subparagraph (A) shall only apply to those retailers who are in substantial compliance with this part.

For purposes of the sales tax, if the retailers establish to the satisfaction of the board that the sales tax has been added to the total amount of the sale price and has not been absorbed by them, the total amount of the sale price shall be deemed to be the amount received exclusive of the tax imposed. Section 1656.1 of the Civil Code shall apply in determining whether or not the retailers have absorbed the sales tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   Effective September 16, 2002.   Operative January 1, 2003, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 593.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6012, “gross receipts” from the sale of tangible personal property by consumer cooperatives, as defined in subdivision (b), shall not include the value of initial or periodic membership fees and the value of labor performed in lieu of, or as part of, monthly membership fees; provided, the exclusion authorized by this section shall not be interpreted to permit consumer cooperatives to exclude from “gross receipts” the cost of the property sold.

(b) As used in this section, consumer cooperative means a corporation
 or group of persons composed of ultimate producers or consumers, or both, organized for the purpose of conducting any lawful business primarily for the mutual benefit of its shareholders who may be natural or legal persons, and the earnings, savings, or benefits of which are used for the general welfare of the shareholders or patrons or are distributed in the form of cash, stock, evidences of indebtedness, goods, or services, proportionately and equitably among the persons for which it does business upon the basis of the amount of their transactions or participation in production, or both. However, any such corporation may pay out of its net surplus earnings, savings, or benefits, not to exceed 5 percent interest upon its capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.5.   Effective July 7, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.2.

(a) For purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of a used mobilehome, as defined in Section 18014 of the Health and Safety Code, and the “sales price” of a used mobilehome, sold or stored, used, or otherwise consumed in this state shall be based on the current value of the used mobilehome as specified by a recognized value guide, whenever a registered or legal owner sells a used mobilehome through a person licensed under the Health and Safety Code as a dealer and not on the dealer’s own account or through a licensed real estate broker acting pursuant to Section 10131.6 of the Business and
 Professions Code, or whenever a purchaser of a used mobilehome is required to pay the use tax to the Department of Housing and Community Development. If the value guide does not specify the model or manufacturer of a used mobilehome, the value of the used mobilehome shall be established by reference to the highest value in the value guide according to age and size or the actual sales price, whichever is less. If the actual sales price of a used mobilehome is less than the current value specified in the value guide, the “sales price” and “gross receipts” shall be based on the actual sales price of the mobilehome as evidenced by purchase documents. The State Board of Equalization shall approve the value guides for use within this state through regulation.

(b) For the purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of a mobilehome, whether new or used, shall exclude the amount of separately stated escrow fees on the sale of such
 mobilehome.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the “actual sales price” means the total contract price, including, but not limited to, the value of the mobilehome, in place location, awning, skirting, carport, patio, landscaping, shrubs, unattached furnishings, or other items not part of the mobilehome, and documentation fees.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1707) by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1539, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1539.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.3.

(a) For purposes of this part, “gross receipts” and “sales price” do not include that portion of the sales price returned to the purchaser of a used motor vehicle or the purchase price for the purchase of a contract cancellation option pursuant to Section 11713.21 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until October 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 6.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.3.

(a) For purposes of this part, “gross receipts” and “sales price” do not include that portion of the sales price returned to the purchaser of a used motor vehicle or any restocking fees pursuant to Section 1784.43 of the Civil Code.

(b) This section shall become operative October 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 7.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.5.

Nothing in Sections 6011 and 6012 shall affect the exemption afforded under Section 6385 to sales of tangible personal property to a common carrier under the circumstances set forth in Section 6385.

(History: Added by Stats. 1962, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.6.

(a) For the purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of a factory-built school building, and the “sales price” of a factory-built school building, sold or stored, used, or otherwise consumed in this state shall be 40 percent of the sales price of the factory-built school building to the consumer.

(b) For purposes of this section, “factory-built school building” means any building designed in compliance with state laws for school construction and approved by the structural safety section in the office of the State Architect,
 which is either wholly manufactured or is in substantial part manufactured at an offsite location, to be assembled, erected, or installed on a site owned or leased by a school district or a community college district.

(c) For purposes of this section, the place of sale or purchase of a factory-built school building is the place of business of the retailer of the factory-built school building as provided in Section 7205, regardless of whether sale of the building includes installation or whether the building is placed upon a permanent foundation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 763, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.7.

(a) For the purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of factory-built housing, and the “sales price” of factory-built housing, sold or stored, used, or otherwise consumed in this state shall be 40 percent of the sales price of the factory-built housing to the consumer.

(b) For purposes of this section, “factory-built housing” includes:

(1) A residential building, dwelling unit or an individual dwelling room or combination of rooms thereof, or building component,
 assembly, or system manufactured in such a manner that all concealed parts or processes of manufacture cannot be inspected before installation at the building site without disassembly, damage, or destruction of the part, including units designed for use as part of an institution for resident or patient care, which is either wholly manufactured or is in substantial part manufactured at an offsite location to be wholly or partially assembled onsite in accordance with regulations adopted by the Commission of Housing and Community Development of the State of California pursuant to Section 19990 of the Health and Safety Code or in accordance with applicable local building requirements if such factory-built housing is inspected and approved by the local enforcement agency at the place of, and during the time of, manufacture.

(2) “Modular housing,” which is a three-dimensional box or cube-shaped structure or structures making up one or more rooms of a
 residential building.

(3) “Sectionalized housing,” which generally consists of two modules which form a total living unit.

(4) “Modular,” “utility,” or “wet cores,” which are three-dimensional habitable rooms or modules and which are generally comprised of a kitchen or a bathroom or bathrooms.

(c) For purposes of this section, “factory-built housing” does not include: 

(1) A “mobilehome,” as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Precut housing packages” where more than 50 percent of the package consists of precut lumber only.

(3) “Panelized construction,” such as walls or components that may become one
 or more rooms of a building, unless a complete housing package is provided by the builder or manufacturer, such as by providing wall panels, floors, and a roof which will form a complete housing structure.

(4) “Porches” or “awnings” which are not purchased as a part of the original housing package.

(d) If a purchaser certifies in writing to a retailer that the factory-built housing purchased will be consumed in a manner or for a purpose entitling the retailer to exclude 60 percent of the gross receipts or sales price from the measure of tax, and uses the property in some other manner or for some other purpose, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of tax measured by 60 percent of the sales price.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1246, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1246.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.8.

(a) For the purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of a new mobilehome, and the “sales price” of a new mobilehome sold or stored, used, or otherwise consumed in this state shall be 75 percent of the sales price of the mobilehome to the retailer, if the mobilehome is sold by the retailer to the purchaser for installation on a foundation system pursuant to Section 18551 of the Health and Safety Code for occupancy as a residence, and is thereafter subject to property taxation. The retailer shall be considered to be the consumer for purposes of this part if the sale by the retailer would otherwise have been subject to
 sales tax and if the retailer is not also the manufacturer of the mobilehome. If the retailer of the mobilehome is the manufacturer, tax shall be measured by an amount equal to 75 percent of the sales price at which a similar mobilehome ready for installation would be sold by the manufacturer to a retailer-consumer in this state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a retailer may give a resale certificate for the purchase by the retailer of such a mobilehome and shall report the gross receipts or sales price from the purchase with the return for the period during which the mobilehome is sold to the purchaser for installation for occupancy as a residence.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any retailer who is a licensed mobilehome dealer under Section 18002.6 of the Health and Safety Code is a retailer-consumer regardless of whether or not it installs the mobilehome on a foundation system as an
 improvement to realty. The licensed dealer may give a resale certificate for the purchase of such a mobilehome, and shall report the gross receipts or sales price from the purchase with the return for the period during which the mobilehome is installed by the licensed dealer for occupancy as a residence.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “mobilehome” is defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) If a purchaser certifies in writing to a retailer that the mobilehome purchased will be consumed in a manner or for a purpose entitling the retailer to exclude 25 percent of the gross receipts or sales price to the retailer from the measure of tax, and uses the property in some other manner or for some other purpose which would not be subject to any other exclusion or exemption under this part, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of tax measured by the
 amount of the sales price to the purchaser less an amount equal to 75 percent of the gross receipts or sales price of the mobilehome to the retailer.

(d) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any used mobilehome, the initial retail sale of which qualified for the partial exemption from tax provided for by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 608, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.9.

(a) For the purposes of this part, “gross receipts” from the sale of a new mobilehome, and the “sales price” of a new mobilehome sold or stored, used or otherwise consumed in this state shall be 75 percent of the sales price of the mobilehome to the retailer, if such mobilehome is sold by the retailer to the purchaser for installation for occupancy as a residence pursuant to the requirements of Section 18613 of the Health and Safety Code, and is thereafter subject to property taxation. The retailer shall be considered to be the consumer for purposes of this part if the sale by the retailer would otherwise have been subject to
 sales tax and if the retailer is not also the manufacturer of the mobilehome. If the retailer of the mobilehome is the manufacturer, tax shall be measured by an amount equal to 75 percent of the sales price at which a similar mobilehome ready for installation would be sold by the manufacturer to a retailer-consumer in this state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a retailer may give a resale certificate for the purchase by the retailer of such a mobilehome and shall report the gross receipts or sales price from such purchase with the return for the period during which the mobilehome is sold to the purchaser for installation for occupancy as a residence.

(b) For the purpose of this section, a “mobilehome” is defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) If a purchaser certifies in writing to a
 retailer that the mobilehome purchased will be consumed in a manner or for a purpose entitling the retailer to exclude 25 percent of the gross receipts or sales price to the retailer from the measure of tax, and uses the property in some other manner or for some other purpose which would not be subject to any other exclusion or exemption under this part, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of tax measured by the amount of the sales price to the purchaser less an amount equal to 75 percent of the gross receipts or sales price of the mobilehome to the retailer.

(d) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any used mobilehome, the initial retail sale of which qualified for the partial exemption from tax provided for by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1149, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.

“Business” includes any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by him with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6014.

“Seller” includes every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property of a kind the gross receipts from the retail sale of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales tax.

For the purposes of this section, the phrase “tangible personal property of a kind the gross receipts from the retail sale of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales tax” includes all tangible personal property of a kind the gross receipts from the retail sale of which is, or would be, required to be included in the measure of the sales tax if sold at
 retail, whether or not the tangible personal property is ever sold at retail or is suitable for sale at retail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   Effective July 11, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

6015.

(a) “Retailer” includes: 

(1) Every seller who makes any retail sale or sales of tangible personal property, and every person engaged in the business of making retail sales at auction of tangible personal property owned by the person or others. 

(2) Every person engaged in the business of making sales for storage, use, or other consumption or in the business of making sales at auction of tangible personal property owned by the person or others for storage, use, or other
 consumption. 

(3) Any person conducting a race meeting under Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, with respect to horses which are claimed during such meeting. 

(b) When the board determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part to regard any salesmen, representatives, peddlers, or canvassers as the agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the tangible personal property sold by them, irrespective of whether they are making sales on their own behalf or on behalf of the dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers the board may so regard them and may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers as retailers for purposes of this part. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a
 newspaper carrier is not a retailer and the retailer is the publisher or distributor for whom the carrier delivers the newspapers. The publisher or distributor is responsible for the tax measured by the price charged to the customer by the carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 15, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 85, as amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 88, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

“Tangible personal property” means personal property which may be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or which is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

(a) “Tangible personal property” means either of the following:

(1) Personal property
 that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, touched, or is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.

(2) A digital product and any copyright or patent interests associated therewith.

(b) The amendments made this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 9.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.1.

(a) “Digital product” means prewritten computer software transferred on tangible storage media, transferred electronically, or accessed remotely.

(b) “Digital product” does not include any of the following:

(1) A digital asset.

(2) A digital audio work.

(3) A digital audiovisual work.

(4) A digital book.

(5) Digital infrastructure.

(6) A digital video game
 product.

(7) A digital visual work.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Computer” has the meaning defined in Section 6010.9.

(2) “Computer software” has the meaning defined in Section 6010.9.

(3) “Custom computer software” has the meaning defined in Section 6010.9.

(4) “Digital asset” means a digital representation of value that is recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger or any similar technology, as specified by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States.

(5) “Digital audio work” means a work that results from the fixation of a series
 of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including a ringtone or music, that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(6) “Digital audiovisual work” means a series of related images that when shown in succession impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any, that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(7) “Digital book” means a work that is generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as a book that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely.
